California statutes. Education Code
(4) A monitoring authority shall access the system to review the initial data file and any documentation or additional information submitted by a local educational agency for which it is a monitoring authority and make a determination of potential misassignments and vacant positions within 90 days of the commission’s notification pursuant to paragraph (1).

(5) The commission shall have the authority to make a final determination for all potential assignments and misassignments.

(6) After the 90-day review period
 pursuant to paragraph (4), the commission shall share all educator assignment data, including all preliminary and clear credentials, intern credentials, permits, waivers, misassignments, and vacant positions for that year, with the department for the department’s teaching assignment monitoring outcomes report and other state and federal reporting requirements.

(7) Once published, the commission shall post a link to the department’s teaching assignment monitoring outcomes reporting on its internet website, with resources for local educational agencies seeking to maintain a fully credentialed and appropriately assigned educator workforce.

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission, when identifying misassignments using the system, shall identify an educator in a teaching position, including an educator at a charter school, as correctly assigned only when the educator holds
 the certificate or credential required by the commission for that assignment in a noncharter public school, taking into account local assignment options.

(9) Commencing in the 2020–21 school year, a chartering authority, as provided in this section, may request technical assistance to assist in its determination of potential misassignments and vacant positions from the county office of education in the county in which the chartering authority is located.

(10) For a school district, the county superintendent of schools shall notify, through the office of the school district superintendent, a certificated school administrator responsible for the assignment of a certificated person to a position for which the person has no legal authorization of the misassignment, and shall advise the school administrator to correct the assignment within 30 calendar days. For a charter school, the
 monitoring authority shall notify the charter school administrator responsible for the assignment of a certificated person to a position for which the person has no legal authorization of the misassignment and shall advise the charter school administrator to correct the assignment within 30 calendar days.

(f) The system and the data reported from the system shall not be used by a local educational agency for purposes of evaluating certificated employees, certificated employee performance determinations, or employment decisions.

(g) If an employee, including an employee who is employed by a charter school, is required by a local educational agency to accept an assignment in a teaching or services position for which the employee has no legal authorization, all of the following shall occur:

(1) (A) After exhausting existing local remedies, an employee of a school district shall notify the superintendent of the school district, and an employee of a charter school shall notify the administrator of the charter school, in writing, of the illegal assignment.

(B) If no action is taken after the notice required pursuant to subparagraph (A), an employee of a school district shall notify the county superintendent of schools, and an employee of a charter school shall notify the chartering authority, in writing, of the illegal assignment.

(2) In the case of an assignment by a school district for which the employee has filed a notice that the employee has no legal authorization, the school district or county superintendent of schools shall advise the employee about the legality of the assignment within 15 working days. In the case of an assignment by a charter school
 for which the employee has filed a notice that the employee has no legal authorization, the administrator of the charter school or the chartering authority shall advise the employee about the legality of the assignment within 15 working days.

(3) A local educational agency shall not take adverse action against an employee who files a notice of misassignment pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of a charter school authorized by the state board, the employee shall file the written notices regarding misassignment described in paragraph (1) with the commission.

(5) During the period of a misassignment, the certificated employee who files a written notice pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be exempt from Section 45034.

(6) If it is determined that a misassignment has occurred, a performance evaluation pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3 of the certificated employee in the misassignment shall be nullified.

(7) A certificated employee who has not attained permanent status is subject to the protections described in this subdivision and subdivision (f) even if the certificated employee does not provide notice pursuant to paragraph (1).

(h) For the 2019–20 school year, the final data file generated by the system to identify misassignments and vacant positions shall be nonconsequential and shall be provided to the department, local educational agencies, and monitoring authorities by the commission for informational purposes only.

(i) Commencing
 with the 2020–21 school year, and each school year thereafter, following the 90-day review period provided for monitoring authorities pursuant to subdivision (e), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure local educational agencies have access to the results of the system’s process of assignment monitoring to support local continuous improvement efforts.

(2) Publish annual certificated educator assignment data that reflects the level of preparation and licensure of educators serving California pupils. This data shall include comprehensive information on all educator assignments, including those filled by individuals on permits or waivers, intern credentials, and preliminary or clear credentials, and those appropriately assigned and misassigned, at the schoolsite, local educational agency, county, and state levels. The commission may also publish data on educators
 serving on administrative and pupil services credentials, educator preparation pathways, and educator retention, and whether certificated staff are employed in K–12 education.

(3) (A) Identify instances of a teacher shortage in each instance where, as of Census Day, a course or class assignment is permanently filled by an employee who is not fully credentialed or who is not appropriately assigned, as identified in clauses (i) to (vii), inclusive, below:

(i) Individuals who are fully credentialed teachers and are serving outside their credential area based on holding a valid commission-issued permit authorizing the subject, setting, or pupil population being taught.

(ii) Individuals who are fully credentialed teachers and are serving outside of their credential area pursuant to a statute or Title
 5 of the California Code Regulations that allows a local educational agency to otherwise legally assign the individual at the local level.

(iii) Individuals serving on a valid district or university intern credential that authorizes the subject, setting, or pupil population being taught.

(iv) Individuals who are fully credentialed teachers but are teaching a subject, setting, or pupil population not authorized by their credential area, excluding assignments authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 80005 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(v) Individuals serving on the basis of a valid permit issued by the commission that authorizes the subject, setting, or pupil population being taught.

(vi) Individuals serving on a short-term or
 variable-term waiver document issued by the commission that authorizes the subject, setting, or pupil population being taught.

(vii) Individuals who are identified as misassigned by the commission, other than those educators described in clause (iv).

(B) Identify instances of a teacher shortage in each instance where, as of Census Day, a local educational agency identifies a vacant position or an unfilled position.

(4) Support the department to do all of the following:

(A) Make annual educator assignment, misassignment, and vacant position data generated by the system publicly available in a searchable format on the department’s internet website. Data shall be updated annually and provide comprehensive information on teaching assignment outcomes
 inclusive of all educator classifications at the schoolsite, school district, and county levels.

(B) Ensure that data for charter schools is distinguishable from data for noncharter public schools when made publicly available in a searchable format.

(C) Maintain each year’s data for no less than five years.

(D) Ensure that the publicly available misassignment data reported from the system shall not include any personally identifiable information, including names, social security numbers, home addresses, telephone numbers, or email addresses of individual educators.

(j) The commission may promulgate regulations that define standards for a local educational agency, including a charter school, that consistently misassigns educators and what sanctions, if
 any, to impose on that local educational agency.

(k) (1) On or before December 1, 2022, the commission shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the development of the system, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The development and current status of the system.

(B) The ability of the system to efficiently produce accurate annual data on teacher misassignments.

(C) Statewide information regarding misassignments, delineated by credential type, assignment, and type of school.

(D) Use of local assignment options, delineated by local assignment option and type of school.

(E) Any recommendations to improve the system and the local assignment monitoring process required by this section.

(F) Identification of any need for further technical assistance for local educational agencies, including chartering authorities, to improve assignment monitoring and reduce the overall rate of misassignment.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the reporting requirement described in paragraph (1) shall be inoperative on December 1, 2026.

(l) This section shall not relieve a local educational agency from compliance with state and federal law regarding teachers of English learners or be construed to alter the definition of “misassignment” for purposes of Section 33126 or the definition of “vacancy” for purposes of Section
 35186.

(m) This section does not change existing rights or obligations, including, but not limited to, those specified in Sections 33126 and 33315.

(n) (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, a teacher employed by a local educational agency and offering a course in which pupils receive course credit or that counts toward instructional minutes, or both, shall hold the certificate, permit, or other document required by the commission for that assignment and shall be reported to the department by the local educational agency annually and monitored, as specified in subdivision (e).

(2) Paragraph (1) does not
 authorize a local educational agency to assign a teacher of record that is not an employee of the local educational agency.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education,
 or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 2.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.

(a) Except as provided in clauses (i) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), a program of professional preparation for multiple or single subject teaching credentials shall not include more than two years of full-time study of professional preparation.

(b) The minimum requirements for the preliminary multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential are all of the following:

(1) A baccalaureate degree or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education. Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 44227, for single subject teaching credentials, the baccalaureate degree shall not be in professional education. The
 commission shall encourage regionally accredited institutions of higher education to offer undergraduate minors in education and special education to students who intend to become single subject credentialed teachers.

(2) [Reserved]

(3) (A) Satisfactory completion of a program of professional preparation that has been accredited by the Committee on Accreditation on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission. In accordance with the commission’s assessment and performance standards, a program shall include a teaching performance assessment as set forth in Section 44320.2 that is aligned with the California Standards for the Teaching Profession. The commission shall ensure that a candidate recommended for a credential or certificate has demonstrated satisfactory ability to assist pupils to meet or exceed
 academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board. Programs that meet this requirement for professional preparation shall include any of the following:

(i) Integrated programs of subject matter preparation and professional preparation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44259.1.

(ii) Postbaccalaureate programs of professional preparation, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 44259.1.

(iii) Internship programs of professional preparation, pursuant to Section 44321, Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325), Article 11 (commencing with Section 44380), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3.

(iv) Degree programs offered pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78060) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of
 Division 7 of Title 3.

(B) A program of professional preparation pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall provide experience that addresses all of the following:

(i) Health education, including a basic understanding of youth mental health, study of nutrition, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, and the physiological and sociological effects of the abuse of alcohol, narcotics, and drugs and the use of tobacco. Training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall also meet the standards established by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.

(ii) Field experience in methods of delivering appropriate educational services to pupils with exceptional needs in regular education programs.

(iii) Advanced computer-based technology, including the uses of
 technology in educational settings.

(4) Study of effective means of teaching literacy, including, but not limited to, the study of reading as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B), and evidence-based means of teaching foundational reading skills in print concepts, phonological awareness, phonics and word recognition, and fluency to all pupils, including tiered supports for pupils with reading difficulties, English learners, and pupils with exceptional needs. The study of effective means of teaching literacy shall be in accordance with the commission’s standards of program quality and effectiveness and current teaching performance expectations, shall be aligned to the current English Language Arts/English Language Development (ELA/ELD) Framework adopted by the state board, and shall incorporate the program guidelines for dyslexia developed pursuant to Section 56335. The study of reading shall meet the following requirements:

(A) Commencing January 1, 1997, satisfactory completion of comprehensive reading instruction that is research based and includes all of the following:

(i) The study of organized, systematic, explicit skills including phonemic awareness, direct, systematic, explicit phonics, and decoding skills.

(ii) A strong literature, language, and comprehension component with a balance of oral and written language.

(iii) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(iv) Early intervention techniques.

(v) Guided practice in a clinical setting.

(B) For
 purposes of this section, “direct, systematic, explicit phonics” means phonemic awareness, spelling patterns, the direct instruction of sound/symbol codes and practice in connected text, and the relationship of direct, systematic, explicit phonics to the components set forth in clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subparagraph (A).

(C) A program for the multiple subject teaching credential and the education specialist teaching credential also shall include the study of integrated methods of teaching language arts.

(5) (A) Verification of subject matter competence, demonstrated through one of the following methods:

(i) Completion of a subject matter program approved by the commission on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section
 44310).

(ii) Passage of a subject matter examination pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 44280).

(iii) Successful completion of coursework at one or more regionally accredited institutions of higher education that addresses each of the domains of the subject matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential pursuant to Section 44282, as verified by a commission-approved program of professional preparation.
For PK-3 early childhood education specialist credentials, completion of 24 semester units or the equivalent quarter units of nonremedial, degree-applicable coursework at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in early childhood education or child development. Coursework completed at a community or junior college that is regionally accredited by an accrediting agency listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 44203 or by the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges may count for purposes of this clause.

(iv) Successful completion of a baccalaureate or higher degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher education with the following, as applicable:

(I) For single subject credentials, a major in one of the subject areas closely related to an area in which the commission credentials candidates.

(II) For multiple subject credentials, a liberal studies
 major, education major, or other degree major that includes coursework required for the degree major in the content areas pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44282.

(III) For PK-3 early childhood education specialist credentials, a major in child development, education, or a degree major in a subject area closely related to the credential area. For the PK-3 early childhood education specialist credentials, a major in a subject area closely related to the credential area means a baccalaureate or higher degree whose required coursework for the degree major includes not fewer than three courses, totaling at
 least 12 semester units or the equivalent quarter units, in child development, human development, or early childhood education.

(IV) For education specialist credentials, either a major in one of the subject areas in which the commission credentials candidates or a liberal studies or other major that includes coursework in the content areas pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44282.

(v) Demonstration that the candidate, through a combination of the methods described in clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) in whole or in part, has met or exceeded each of the domains of the subject
 matter requirements adopted by the commission in the content area of the credential pursuant to Section 44282 for multiple and single subject credentials, or pursuant to Section 44265 for education specialist credentials.

(B) (i) The commission shall ensure that subject matter standards and examinations are aligned with the academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.

(ii) The commission shall maintain the subject matter domains that include both broad content areas to support coursework review pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) and specific content elements to delineate subject matter examination specifications pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 44280).

(6) Demonstration of a knowledge of the
 principles and provisions of the Constitution of the United States pursuant to Section 44335.

(7) Demonstration, in accordance with the commission’s standards of program quality and effectiveness, of basic competency in the use of computers in the classroom as determined by one of the following:

(A) Successful completion of a commission-approved program or course.

(B) Successful passage of an assessment that is developed, approved, and administered by the commission.

(c) The minimum requirements for the clear multiple or single subject teaching credential shall include all of the following requirements:

(1) Possession of a valid preliminary teaching credential, as prescribed in subdivision
 (b), possession of a valid equivalent credential or certificate, or completion of equivalent requirements as determined by the commission.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), completion of a program of beginning teacher induction, including either of the following:

(A) A program of beginning teacher induction that is provided by one or more local educational agencies and has been approved by the commission on the basis of initial review and periodic evaluations of the program in relation to appropriate standards of credential program quality and effectiveness that have been adopted by the commission pursuant to this subdivision. The program standards shall encourage innovation and experimentation in the continuous preparation and induction of beginning teachers.

(B) A program of beginning teacher induction that
 is sponsored by a regionally accredited institution of higher education in cooperation with one or more local school districts, that addresses the individual professional needs of beginning teachers and meets the commission’s standards of induction. The commission shall ensure that preparation and induction programs that qualify candidates for professional credentials extend and refine each beginning teacher’s professional skills in relation to the California Standards for the Teaching Profession and the academic content and performance standards for pupils adopted by the state board.

(3) (A) If a candidate satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b) through completion of an accredited internship program of professional preparation, and if that internship program fulfills induction standards and is approved as set forth in this subdivision, the commission shall determine that the candidate has fulfilled the requirements
 of paragraph (2).

(B) If an approved induction program is verified as unavailable to a beginning teacher, the commission shall accept completion of an approved clear credential program after completion of a baccalaureate degree at a regionally accredited institution of higher education as fulfilling the requirements of paragraph (2). The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this subparagraph.

(d) The commission shall develop and implement standards of program quality and effectiveness that provide for the areas of application listed in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), starting in professional preparation and continuing through induction.

(e) A credential that was issued before January 1, 1993, shall remain in force as long as it is valid under the
 laws and regulations that were in effect on the date it was issued. The commission shall not, by regulation, invalidate an otherwise valid credential, unless it issues to the holder of the credential, in substitution, a new credential authorized by another provision in this chapter that is no more restrictive than the credential for which it was substituted with respect to the kind of service authorized and the grades, classes, or types of schools in which it authorizes service.

(f) A credential program that is approved by the commission shall not deny an individual access to that program solely on the grounds that the individual obtained a teaching credential through completion of an internship program when that internship program has been accredited by the commission.

(g) Notwithstanding this section, persons who were performing teaching services as of January 1, 1999, pursuant
 to the language of this section that was in effect before that date, may continue to perform those services without complying with any requirements that may be added by the amendments adding this subdivision.

(h) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) does not apply to any person who, as of January 1, 1997, holds a multiple or single subject teaching credential, or to any person enrolled in a program of professional preparation for a multiple or single subject teaching credential as of January 1, 1997, who subsequently completes that program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) apply only to persons who enter a program of professional preparation on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 60.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.1.

(a) (1) An integrated program of professional preparation shall enable candidates for teaching credentials to engage in professional preparation, concurrently with subject matter preparation, while completing baccalaureate degrees at regionally accredited institutions of higher education. An integrated program shall provide opportunities for candidates to complete intensive field experiences, including student teaching, in public schools maintaining prekindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, early in the undergraduate sequence. The development and implementation of
 an integrated program shall be based on intensive collaboration among subject matter departments and education units within regionally accredited institutions of higher education and local public elementary and secondary school districts.

(2) A regionally accredited institution of higher education may offer a four-year or five-year integrated program of professional preparation that allows a student to earn a baccalaureate degree and a preliminary multiple or single subject teaching credential, early childhood specialist credential, or an education specialist instruction credential authorizing the holder to teach special education, including student teaching requirements, concurrently and within four or five years of study.

(3) The commission shall encourage regionally
 accredited institutions of higher education to offer integrated programs of professional preparation that follow the guidelines developed pursuant to this section. In approving integrated programs, the commission shall not compromise or reduce its standards of subject matter preparation pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 44310) or its standards of professional preparation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(4) The commission shall, as part of its accreditation process, collect information about integrated programs of professional preparation, including which regionally accredited institutions of higher education offer integrated programs of professional preparation and the number and type of credentials the programs produce.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2005–06 school year, an integrated program offered by the California
 State University shall be designed to concurrently lead to a preliminary multiple subject or single subject teaching credential,
 early childhood specialist credential, or an education specialist instruction credential authorizing the holder to teach special education, and a baccalaureate degree. Recommendation for each shall be contingent upon satisfactory completion of the requirements for each.

(2) By July 1, 2004, the Chancellor of the California State University, in consultation with California State University faculty members, shall develop a framework defining appropriate balance for an integrated program of general education, subject matter preparation, and professional education courses, for both lower division and upper division students, including an appropriate range of units to be taken in professional education courses. In developing the framework, the Chancellor of the California State University and California State University faculty members shall consult with the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges
 on matters related to the effective and efficient use of, and appropriate role for, lower division coursework in an integrated program.

(c) (1) By January 1, 2005, the Chancellor of the California State University and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall collaboratively ensure that both of the following occur:

(A) Lower division coursework completed by a community college student transferring to a California State University integrated program is articulated with the corresponding coursework of the California State University.

(B) The articulated community college lower division coursework is accepted as the equivalent to the coursework offered to students who enter that integrated program as freshman students.

(2) Commencing with the 2005–06 school year, each campus of the California State University shall invite the community colleges in its region that send significant numbers of transfer students to that campus to enter into articulation agreements. These articulation agreements shall be based on a fully transferable education curriculum that is developed pursuant to the framework developed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). Approval of one or more of the articulation agreements shall enable the coursework of a community college student to be accepted as the equivalent to the coursework offered to students who enter that integrated program as freshman students.

(d) A postbaccalaureate program of professional preparation may only be offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education. These programs shall enable candidates for teaching credentials to commence and complete professional preparation after they have
 completed baccalaureate degrees at regionally accredited institutions of higher education. The development and implementation of a postbaccalaureate program of professional preparation shall be based on intensive collaboration among the regionally accredited institutions of higher education and local public elementary and secondary school districts.

(e) (1) (A) The commission shall develop and implement a program to award, on a competitive basis, planning grants of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) each to regionally accredited institutions of higher education for the development of
 plans to guide the creation of four-year integrated programs of professional preparation, including student
 teaching, that lead to more credentialed teachers to teach, with an emphasis on the shortage fields identified in clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2).

(B) A regionally accredited institution of higher education awarded a planning grant under this
 paragraph may use the
 grant funds to create a new four-year integrated program of professional preparation or to adapt an existing integrated program of professional preparation to a four-year integrated program of professional preparation.

(C) A regionally accredited institution of higher education awarded a planning grant under this paragraph
 may use grant funds for any proper purpose in support of planning for a four-year integrated program of professional preparation, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) To provide faculty release time to redesign existing courses.

(ii) To provide
 stipends for program coordinators to assist in collaboration with subject-matter professors and pedagogy professors.

(iii) To create summer courses for students in a four-year integrated program of professional preparation.

(iv) To recruit individuals for participation as students in
 four-year integrated programs of professional preparation.

(2) (A) The commission shall develop and implement a program to award, on a competitive basis, implementation or expansion grants of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) each to regionally accredited institutions of higher education for any of the following purposes:

(i) Developing a new integrated program of professional preparation as specified in subparagraph (C).

(ii) Establishing a new partnership with California community colleges to create four-year integrated programs of professional preparation.

(B) The commission shall conduct outreach to eligible institutions to encourage applications to develop programs in the shortage areas identified in clause (i) of subparagraph (C), and support institutions that need assistance in developing programs in these shortage areas that meet the commission’s criteria.

(C) The commission shall award one-time grants pursuant to subparagraph (A) for proposals to establish new integrated programs of professional preparation that support either of the following:

(i) Producing teachers in the designated shortage fields of special education, bilingual education, science,
 health, computer science, technology, engineering, mathematics, transitional kindergarten, or kindergarten.

(ii) Partnering with a California community college to create a four-year integrated program of professional preparation.

(D) A regionally accredited institution of higher education awarded a grant under this paragraph may use the grant funds to create a new four-year
 integrated program of professional preparation or to adapt an existing integrated program of professional preparation to a four-year integrated program of professional preparation.

(E) A regionally accredited institution of higher education awarded a grant under this paragraph may use grant funds for any proper purpose in support of implementation or expansion of a four-year integrated program of professional preparation, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) To provide faculty release time to redesign existing courses.

(ii) To provide stipends for program coordinators to assist in collaboration with subject-matter professors and pedagogy professors.

(iii) To create summer courses for students in a four-year integrated program of professional preparation.

(iv) To recruit individuals for participation as students in four-year integrated programs of professional preparation.

(F) As a condition of the receipt of
 an implementation or expansion
 grant, a regionally accredited institution of higher education shall provide to the commission program and outcome data for at least
 five years after receiving the grant. The information shall include program design and features, the number of graduates, the number and type of credentials earned, the time taken to earn a degree and credential, and any other information the commission may require for purposes of documenting the effect of the grant and identifying effective practices in program design and implementation.

(3) The commission shall require applicants for planning grants under paragraph (1) and for implementation or expansion grants under paragraph (2) to provide assurances of all of the following:

(A) A commitment to implement a planned integrated program of
 professional preparation.

(B) A plan for recruitment and retention of candidates for educator shortage areas in subjects identified in clause (i) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) in teacher preparation programs, including integrated programs of professional preparation.

(C) Coordination with existing sources of candidate support, such as the Golden State Teacher Grant Program established pursuant to Article 5.1 (commencing with Section 69617) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3, and other forms of financial aid.

(D) Demonstrated commitment to expand enrollment in, and access to, teacher preparation programs, including enrollment in programs of integrated professional preparation.

(4) A regionally accredited institution of higher education that previously received a planning grant or an implementation or expansion grant may apply for a new grant, if the institution reports on the implementation timeline and status of the program established with the grant funding previously received and proposes any of the following:

(A) Expansion of integrated program capacity.

(B) New integrated programs in other credentialing fields.

(C) New California community college partnerships.

(5) The commission may use up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of moneys appropriated for purposes of this subdivision to administer the grants described in paragraphs (1) and (2), pursuant to Department of Finance approval.

(6) The commission shall annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of
 the Legislature on any grants funded pursuant to this subdivision until funds are fully expended. In addition to the data required to be reported to the commission in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2), the report shall also include data on the progress of community college partnerships and institutions relative to the assurances made pursuant to paragraph (3).

(7) The requirements of this subdivision are contingent upon the appropriation of funds for purposes of this subdivision in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 50.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44259.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, including, but not limited to, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, the commission shall waive the requirements for completion of a program of professional preparation for any individual with a minimum of six years of full-time teaching experience in a regionally accredited private school, as determined by the commission, in the subject and level of the credential sought, who complies with all of the following:

(1) The individual submits evidence of two years of rigorous performance evaluations while teaching in an accredited private school, based on criteria determined by the commission, on which the applicant received ratings of satisfactory or
 better.

(2) The individual meets the California requirements for teacher fitness pursuant to Sections 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(3) The individual satisfies the requirement for preparation in the instruction of pupils who are English language learners in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259 and subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 44259.5.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, including, but not limited to, paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, the commission shall waive the requirements for completion of the professional field experience component of a program of professional preparation for any individual with a minimum of three years of full-time teaching experience in an accredited private school, as determined by the commission, in the subject and level